Maryland, session 2026, SB0189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
5–803.
(h) (1) There is a comprehensive flood management grant program within the
Department.
(2) (i) Subject to the approval of the Board of Public Works, the
Department may use proceeds from the State debt created to fund the comprehensive flood
management grant program to pay the entire cost of watershed studies pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section.
(ii) The Department may provide grants to subdivisions to pay the
entire cost of watershed studies when the Department delegates that responsibility pursuant
to subsection (b) of this section.
(3) (i) Subject to the approval of the Board of Public Works, the
Department may provide grants to subdivisions for flood control and watershed
management capital projects, and for the capital costs related to design, purchase, and
installation of automated flood warning projects, provided that the projects are consistent
with the plans and implementation prepared and adopted in accordance with this subtitle,
and provided further that each project:
1. Is undertaken as part of a comprehensive flood
management plan prepared and adopted by the subdivision; and
2. Is not inconsistent with any State or interjurisdictional
flood management plan.
(ii) Grants for automated flood warnings projects shall be
conditioned to require all affected local governing bodies to:

SENATE BILL 189 3
1. Adopt a specific and compatible response plan which has
been coordinated with local emergency management authorities and reviewed and approved
by the Department and the Maryland Department of Emergency Management; and
2. Provide for financial and other commitments to properly
operate and maintain the project.
(iii) 1. The amount of any grant made by the Department for a
flood control and watershed management capital project that involves only nonfederal funds
and meets the criteria of this subtitle shall be matched by a minimum amount of 25% of
project costs in local government or private funds.
2. For a flood control and watershed management capital
project that involves federal funding and meets the criteria of this subtitle:
A. The Department may provide up to 50% of the nonfederal
share of the project funding; and
B. Local government or private funds shall provide not less
than 50% of the nonfederal share of the project funding.
(iv) Each project application for a grant under this paragraph shall
be submitted to and reviewed by the State clearinghouse of the Department of Planning in
accordance with established clearinghouse procedures.
(4) (i) Subject to the approval of the Board of Public Works, the
Department may provide grants to subdivisions immediately after a flood for acquisition of
any flood damaged owner–occupied dwelling.
(ii) Total expenditures for grants made under this paragraph may not
exceed 50% of the total authorized budgeted funds in a fiscal year for grants under this
subsection.
(5) (i) The Department may award grants to subdivisions that have
incurred at least $1,000,000 in infrastructure damage caused by a flood event that occurred
on or after January 1, 2009.
(ii) The total amount of grants awarded by the Department to
subdivisions under this paragraph may:
1. For fiscal years 2020, 2021, and 2022, equal up to 100% of
the total amount of money appropriated to the comprehensive flood management program;
and
2. For fiscal year 2023 and each fiscal year thereafter, equal
up to 50% of the total amount of money appropriated to the comprehensive flood
management program.

SENATE BILL 189
(iii) A grant awarded to a subdivision under this paragraph may be:
1. For an amount of up to 50% of the combined cost of
infrastructure repairs, watershed restoration, and emergency work associated with the flood
event;
2. Used for infrastructure repairs, watershed management, or
emergency protection work associated with the flood event; and
3. Used for expenses associated with item 2 of this
subparagraph that the subdivision has already incurred.
(iv) The Department shall prioritize awarding grants under this
paragraph to subdivisions in which:
1. Infrastructure damage occurred in an area designated by
the Maryland Historical Trust as an historic district; or
2. Infrastructure damage caused by a flood event has
occurred more than once within the previous 5 years.
(6) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY AWARD GRANTS TO MUNICIPALITIES
TO PROVIDE MATCHING FUNDS TO ASSIST WITH THE COSTS OF MAKING
IMPROVEMENTS TO EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
4–112 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(II) IN EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2029 THROUGH 2031, $250,000
OF THE MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE COMPREHENSIVE FLOOD MANAGEMENT
GRANT PROGRAM SHALL BE USED TO AWARD GRANTS UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
(7) To receive a grant, the subdivision must participate in the national flood
insurance program.
[(7)] (8) Before awarding a grant under paragraphs (2), (3), or (4) of this
subsection, the Department, in cooperation with the Department of Planning, shall review
the flood control and watershed management operations of the applicant subdivision to
assure that the flood control and watershed management operations are in compliance with
this subtitle.
[(8)] (9) (i) For fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, the
Governor may include in the annual State budget an appropriation for the comprehensive
flood management grant program of up to $20,000,000.
(ii) For fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, at least 40%
of funding provided under the comprehensive flood management grant program shall be

SENATE BILL 189 5
used for projects located in or directly benefiting underserved or overburdened communities,
as defined in § 1–701 of this article.
(iii) Funds not awarded from the comprehensive flood management
grant program by the end of a fiscal year:
1. Shall remain in the program; and
2. Are not subject to § 7–302 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
[(9)] (10) (i) The Department, in consultation with the Department of
Planning, shall adopt regulations necessary for the administration of the grant program.
(ii) These regulations may include:
1. A determination of statewide and interjurisdictional needs
and priorities;
2. Standards of eligibility for applicants and projects;
3. Criteria for recognition of tidal and nontidal areas;
4. Engineering and economic standards and alternatives;
and
5. Procedures for filing and processing contents of
applications.
Article – Local Government
4–112.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM” MEANS A COVER PLACED
OVER THE OPENING OF AN OPEN DRAINAGE INLET IN ORDER TO ALLOW
STORMWATER RUNOFF TO ENTER THE DRAINAGE INLET WHILE PREVENTING LARGE
DEBRIS FROM ENTERING THE DRAINAGE INLET.
(II) “APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM” INCLUDES:
1. A STANDARD YARD INLET;

SENATE BILL 189
2. A RAISED GRATE YARD INLET;
3. A TRASH RACK GRATING, PROVIDED THAT THE RACK
HAS AT LEAST FOUR SIDES, EACH OF WHICH IS AT LEAST AS LARGE AS THE DIAMETER
OF THE SURFACE OPENING; AND
4. FOR NEW DRAINAGE INLETS, A PRECAST CONCRETE
BOX INCORPORATED INTO THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE DRAINAGE INLET.
(3) (I) “OPEN DRAINAGE INLET” MEANS A STRUCTURE WITH A
SURFACE OPENING THAT:
(I) 1. HAS A DIAMETER OF 12 INCHES OR MORE; AND
(II) 2. IS DESIGNED TO COLLECT AND DRAIN STORMWATER
RUNOFF.
(II) “OPEN DRAINAGE INLET” INCLUDES AN OPEN HEADWALL
STRUCTURE ATTACHED TO A CULVERT.
(III) “OPEN DRAINAGE INLET” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A GRATE INLET;
2. A CURB INLET;
3. A COMBINATION CURB AND GRATE INLET;
4. A SURFACE–LEVEL DRAINAGE TUNNEL WITH ONLY
ONE SURFACE–LEVEL INLET AND ONE DIRECT SURFACE–LEVEL OUTLET;
5. A SLOTTED INLET; OR
6. A CULVERT LOCATED ON AN OPEN DRAINAGE
HIGHWAY.
(4) “PRIVATELY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLET” MEANS AN
INLET THAT IS LOCATED ON PRIVATE PROPERTY AND WAS INSTALLED BEFORE
OCTOBER 1, 2026.
(5) (I) “PUBLICLY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLET”
MEANS AN INLET OWNED AND MAINTAINED BY THE MUNICIPALITY THAT WAS
INSTALLED BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026.

SENATE BILL 189 7
(II) “PUBLICLY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLET” DOES
NOT INCLUDE INLETS:
1. OWNED OR MAINTAINED BY A FEDERAL ENTITY,
STATE ENTITY, COUNTY, OR SCHOOL BOARD; OR
2. INSPECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF THE
ENVIRONMENT.
(B) A MUNICIPALITY MAY ENTER PRIVATE PROPERTY TO:
(1) COMPLETE THE INVENTORY REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) INSTALL AN APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, A MUNICIPALITY SHALL INVENTORY
THE NUMBER AND LOCATION OF ALL PUBLICLY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE
INLETS AND PRIVATELY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS IN THE
MUNICIPALITY.
(2) (I) 1. ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1, 2028, A MUNICIPALITY
SHALL DEVELOP A PRIORITIZATION PLAN FOR MAKING IMPROVEMENTS TO
PUBLICLY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS AND PRIVATELY OWNED
EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS.
2. THE PLAN SHALL PRIORITIZE MAKING
IMPROVEMENTS TO PUBLICLY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS AND
PRIVATELY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS THAT POSE THE GREATEST
RISK TO PUBLIC SAFETY.
3. A. A MUNICIPALITY IS NOT REQUIRED TO MAKE
IMPROVEMENTS TO PUBLICLY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS AND
PRIVATELY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS THAT DO NOT POSE A
LEGITIMATE RISK TO PUBLIC SAFETY.
B. A MUNICIPALITY SHALL INCLUDE IN THE PLAN AN
EXPLANATION OF THE REASON FOR EACH PUBLICLY OWNED EXISTING OPEN
DRAINAGE INLET AND PRIVATELY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLET
EXCLUDED FROM THE PRIORITIZATION PLAN.
(II) IMPROVEMENTS MAY INCLUDE:

SENATE BILL 189
1. INSTALLATION OF AN APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM
SECURED TO THE INLET END OF THE OPEN DRAINAGE INLET OR THE CONCRETE
STRUCTURE BUILT TO HOUSE THE DRAINAGE INLET, IN A MANNER THAT PREVENTS
THE APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM FROM BEING REMOVED WITHOUT THE
APPROPRIATE TOOLS OR BY THE FORCE OF FLOOD WATER; OR
2. INSTALLATION OF FENCING THAT:
A. OBSTRUCTS AT LEAST 50% OF ANY OPENING; AND
B. IS DESIGNED AND INSTALLED IN A MANNER THAT
WOULD NOT ALLOW A PERSON TO ENTER THE OPEN DRAINAGE INLET.
(3) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1, 2028, EACH MUNICIPALITY SHALL
NOTIFY A PRIVATE PROPERTY OWNER WITH A PRIVATELY OWNED EXISTING OPEN
DRAINAGE INLET THAT THE INSTALLATION OF AN APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM OR
FENCING IS REQUIRED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1, 2031, EACH MUNICIPALITY SHALL MAKE
IMPROVEMENTS TO ALL PUBLICLY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS AND
PRIVATELY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS INCLUDED IN THE
PRIORITIZATION PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(5) (I) A MUNICIPALITY IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE COST OF
INSTALLING IMPROVEMENTS ON ALL PUBLICLY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE
INLETS AND PRIVATELY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS.
(II) A MUNICIPALITY MAY APPLY TO THE COMPREHENSIVE
FLOOD MANAGEMENT GRANT PROGRAM COMPREHENSIVE FLOOD MANAGEMENT
GRANT PROGRAM WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT TO
COST–SHARE A PORTION OF THE INSTALLATION COSTS.
(D) A MUNICIPALITY IS NOT REQUIRED TO ADD IMPROVEMENTS TO ANY
PUBLICLY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS AND PRIVATELY OWNED
EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLETS IF IT WOULD SIGNIFICANTLY IMPAIR THE
HYDRAULIC CAPACITY OF THE DRAINAGE SYSTEM.
(E) ONCE A MUNICIPALITY HAS INSTALLED AN APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM
ON A PRIVATELY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLET, THE MUNICIPALITY:
(1) IS NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR MAINTAINING IMPROVEMENTS
INSTALLED ON A PRIVATELY OWNED EXISTING OPEN DRAINAGE INLET; AND

SENATE BILL 189 9
(2) MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE FOR INCIDENTS ARISING OUT OF THE
MAINTENANCE OF AN APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM.
(F) ANY NEW OPEN DRAINAGE INLET INSTALLED IN A MUNICIPALITY SHALL
BE EQUIPPED WITH AN APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM THAT MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS FOR INSTALLATION DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
MUNICIPALITY SHALL:
(I) INCORPORATE AN APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM INTO THE
CONSTRUCTION OF ANY NEW OPEN DRAINAGE INLET WITHIN THE MUNICIPALITY;
AND
(II) INSTALL AN APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM ON ANY EXISTING
OPEN DRAINAGE INLET WITHIN THE MUNICIPALITY.
(2) AN APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM CONSTRUCTED OR INSTALLED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE SECURED TO THE INLET END OF THE OPEN
DRAINAGE INLET, OR THE CONCRETE STRUCTURE BUILT TO HOUSE THE DRAINAGE
INLET, IN A MANNER THAT PREVENTS THE APPROVED GRATING SYSTEM FROM
BEING REMOVED WITHOUT THE APPROPRIATE TOOLS OR BY THE FORCE OF FLOOD
WATER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before June 1, 2027,
each municipality in the State shall install an approved grating system on any existing
open drainage inlet within the municipality in accordance with § 4–112 of the Local
Government Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.